New York, session 2025-2026, A9160.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 "the commercial tenant protection act". 3 § 2. The real property law is amended by adding a new section 235-aa 4 to read as follows: 5 § 235-aa. Commercial tenant's right to offset payments. 1. In any case 6 in which a utility company terminates service to a commercial tenant 7 with a triple net lease due to the landlord's failure to pay one or more 8 utility charges for the rented unit or units, and such tenant has fully 9 paid all outstanding rent and other charges to the landlord, the tenant 10 may hold back rent pro-rated for the amount of days the utilities are 11 turned off. 12 2. As used in this section: 13 (a) "triple net lease" means a lease that requires the tenant to pay 14 all expenses on a property, including real estate taxes, property insur- 15 ance, and operating expenses, along with the cost of rent and utilities; 16 and 17 (b) "utility company" includes a utility company as defined in subdi- 18 vision twenty-three of section two of the public service law, a public 19 authority, a water-works corporation as defined in subdivision twenty- 20 seven of section two of the public service law, and a municipal water 21 system as prescribed in section eighty-nine-l of the public service law. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 24 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 25 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 26 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13854-01-5